test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_odd_kirjoittaat_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kirjoittaat - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kirjoittaat+V+Inf: [kirjoittaat, kirjottaat]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [kirjoitan, kirjotan]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kirjoitat, kirjotat]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [kirjoittaa, kirjottaa]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [kirjoitamma, kirjotamma]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [kirjoitatta, kirjotatta]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kirjoitethaan, kirjotethaan]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kirjoitin, kirjotin]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kirjoitit, kirjotit]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kirjoitti, kirjotti]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kirjoitimma, kirjotimma]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kirjoititta, kirjotitta]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kirjoitethiin, kirjotethiin]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kirjoittannu, kirjottannu]
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kirjoitettu, kirjotettu]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [kirjoittanheet, kirjottanheet]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [kirjoittaava, kirjottaava]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [kirjoittaavat, kirjottaavat]
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [kirjoitettava, kirjotettava]
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [kirjoitettavat, kirjotettavat]

     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [kirjoittaisin, kirjottaisin]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [kirjoittaisit, kirjottaisit]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [kirjoittais, kirjottais]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [kirjoittaisima, kirjottaisima]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [kirjoittaisitta, kirjottaisitta]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [kirjoitettais, kirjotettais]
     kirjoittaat+V+Pass+Cond: [kirjoitettais, kirjotettais]

     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [kirjoita, kirjota]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [kirjoittakkaa, kirjottakkaa]

     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: [kirjoittamassa, kirjottamassa]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: [kirjoittamasta, kirjottamasta]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: [kirjoittamhaan, kirjottamhaan]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: [kirjoittamala, kirjottamala]
     kirjoittaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: [kirjoittamatta, kirjottamatta] 
